Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2103
Access College Early Scholarship Program established; purpose.

The Access College Early Scholarship Program is established. The purpose of the program is to provide financial assistance to low-income students for courses to be taken for credit from a qualified postsecondary educational institution while still enrolled in high school. The program shall be administered by the commission.

Laws 2007, LB192, § 4.